Utah statutes.
41-1a-1011.   Use of dismantling permit.

The permit to dismantle issued under Section 41-1a-1010:

(1)  requires the owner to dismantle the vehicle described in the permit unless the vehicle is retitled as provided in Subsection 41-1a-1010(3); and

(2)  entitles the owner of the vehicle to transport the vehicle to the place of business of a dismantler, crusher, or salvage dealer licensed under the provisions of Title 41, Chapter 3, Part 2, Licensing.

